Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3104
Certification administrator; designation; duties; notice to volunteer member; written certification.

(1) Each volunteer department serving a county, city, village, or rural or suburban fire protection district shall designate one member of the department to serve as the certification administrator. The designation of such individual as the certification administrator shall be confirmed and approved by the governing body of such county, city, village, or rural or suburban fire protection district. The certification administrator shall keep and maintain records on the activities of all volunteer members and award points for such activities based upon the standard criteria for qualified active service.

(2) No later than July 15 of each year, the certification administrator shall provide each volunteer member with notice of the total points he or she has accumulated during the first six months of the current calendar year of service.

(3) No later than February 1 of each year, the certification administrator shall provide each volunteer member with a written certification stating the total number of points accumulated by the volunteer member during the immediately preceding calendar year of service and whether the volunteer member has qualified as an active emergency responder, active rescue squad member, or active volunteer firefighter for such year. Such certification may be sent electronically or by mail.

Laws 2016, LB886, § 4;

Laws 2018, LB760, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB222, § 1.